Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Article 8. Remedies.

§ 59.1-508.1.
Remedies in general.

The remedies provided in this chapter are cumulative, but a party may not recover more than once for the same loss.

Except as otherwise provided in §§ 59.1-508.3 and 59.1-508.4, if a party is in breach of contract, whether or not the breach is material, the aggrieved party has the remedies provided in the agreement or this chapter, but the aggrieved party shall continue
to comply with any contractual use terms with respect to information or copies received from the other party, but the contractual use terms do not apply to information or copies properly received or obtained from another source.

Rescission or a claim for rescission of the contract, or refusal of the information, does not preclude and is not inconsistent with a claim for damages or other remedy.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Code Commission, Parts have been changed to Articles in this chapter to correct the 2000 acts.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

§ 59.1-508.2.
Cancellation.

An aggrieved party may cancel a contract if there is a material breach that has not been cured or waived or the agreement allows cancellation for the breach.

Cancellation is not effective until the canceling party gives notice of cancellation to the party in breach, unless a delay required to notify the party would cause or threaten material harm or loss to the aggrieved party. The notification may be in any
form reasonable under the circumstances. However, in an access contract, a party may cancel rights of access without notice.

On cancellation, the following rules apply:

If a party is in possession or control of licensed information, documentation, materials, or copies of licensed information, the following rules apply:

A party that has rightfully refused a copy shall comply with § 59.1-507.6 (b) as to the refused copy.

A party in breach of contract which would be subject to an obligation to deliver under § 59.1-506.18, shall deliver all information, documentation, materials, and copies to the other party or hold them with reasonable care for a reasonable time for disposal
at that party’s instructions. The party in breach of contract shall follow any reasonable instructions received from the other party.

Except as otherwise provided in subparagraphs (A) and (B), the party shall comply with § 59.1-506.18.

All obligations that are executory on both sides at the time of cancellation are discharged, but the following survive:

any right based on previous breach or performance; and

the rights, duties, and remedies described in § 59.1-506.16 (b).

Cancellation of a license by the licensor ends any contractual right of the licensee to use the information, informational rights, copies, or other materials.

Cancellation of a license by the licensee ends any contractual right to use the information, informational rights, copies, or other materials, but the licensee may use the information for a limited time after the license has been canceled if the use:

is within contractual use terms;

is not for distribution and is solely part of measures reasonable under the circumstances to avoid or reduce loss; and

is not contrary to instructions received from the party in breach concerning disposition of them.

The licensee shall pay the licensor the reasonable value of any use after cancellation permitted under paragraph (4).

The obligations under this subsection apply to all information, informational rights, documentation, materials, and copies received by the party and any copies made therefrom.

A term providing that a contract may not be canceled precludes cancellation but does not limit other remedies.

Unless a contrary intention clearly appears, an expression such as “cancellation,” “rescission,” or the like may not be construed as a renunciation or discharge of a claim in damages for an antecedent breach.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

§ 59.1-508.3.
Contractual modification of remedy.

Except as otherwise provided in this section and in § 59.1-508.4:

an agreement may provide for remedies in addition to or in substitution for those provided in this chapter and may limit or alter the measure of damages recoverable under this chapter or a party’s other remedies under this chapter, such as by precluding
a party’s right to cancel for breach of contract, limiting remedies to returning or delivering copies and repayment of the contract fee, or limiting remedies to repair or replacement of the nonconforming copies; and

resort to a contractual remedy is optional unless the remedy is expressly agreed to be exclusive, in which case it is the sole remedy.

Subject to subsection (c), if performance of an exclusive or limited remedy causes the remedy to fail of its essential purpose, the aggrieved party may pursue other remedies under this chapter.

Failure or unconscionability of an agreed exclusive or limited remedy makes a term disclaiming or limiting consequential or incidental damages unenforceable unless the agreement expressly makes the disclaimer or limitation independent of the agreed remedy.

Consequential damages and incidental damages may be excluded or limited by agreement unless the exclusion or limitation is unconscionable. Exclusion or limitation of consequential damages for personal injury in a consumer contract for a computer program
that is subject to this chapter and is contained in consumer goods is prima facie unconscionable, but exclusion or limitation of damages for a commercial loss is not unconscionable.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

§ 59.1-508.4.
Liquidation of damages.

Damages for breach of contract by either party may be liquidated by agreement in an amount that is reasonable in light of:

the loss anticipated at the time of contracting;

the actual loss; or

the actual or anticipated difficulties of proving loss in the event of breach.

If a term liquidating damages is unenforceable under this subsection, the aggrieved party may pursue the remedies provided in this chapter, except as limited by other terms of the contract.

If a party justifiably withholds delivery of copies because of the other party’s breach of contract, the party in breach is entitled to restitution for any amount by which the sum of the payments it made for the copies exceeds the amount of the liquidated
damages payable to the aggrieved party in accordance with subsection (a). The right to restitution is subject to offset to the extent that the aggrieved party establishes:

a right to recover damages other than under subsection (a); and

the amount or value of any benefits received by the party in breach, directly or indirectly, by reason of the contract.

A term that does not liquidate damages, but that limits damages available to the aggrieved party, must be evaluated under § 59.1-508.3.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

§ 59.1-508.5.
Limitation of actions.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), an action for breach of contract must be commenced within the later of four years after the right of action accrues or one year after the breach was or should have been discovered, but not later than five
years after the right of action accrues.

If the original agreement of the parties alters the period of limitations, the following rules apply:

The parties may reduce the period of limitation to not less than one year after the right of action accrues but may not extend it.

In a consumer contract, the period of limitation may not be reduced.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d), a right of action accrues when the act or omission constituting a breach of contract occurs, even if the aggrieved party did not know of the breach. A right of action for breach of warranty accrues when
tender of delivery of a copy pursuant to § 59.1-506.6, or access to the information, occurs. However, if the warranty expressly extends to future performance of the information or a copy, the right of action accrues when the performance
fails to conform to the warranty, but not later than the date the warranty expires.

In the following cases, a right of action accrues on the later of the date the act or omission constituting the breach of contract occurred or the date on which it was or should have been discovered by the aggrieved party, but not earlier than the date
for delivery of a copy if the claim relates to information in the copy:

a breach of warranty against third-party claims for:

infringement or misappropriation; or

libel, slander, or the like;

a breach of contract involving a party’s disclosure or misuse of confidential information; or

a failure to provide an indemnity or to perform another obligation to protect or defend against a third-party claim.

If an action commenced within the period of limitation is so concluded as to leave available a remedy by another action for the same breach of contract, the other action may be commenced after expiration of the period of limitation if the action is commenced
within six months after conclusion of the first action, unless the action was concluded as a result of voluntary discontinuance or dismissal for failure or neglect to prosecute.

This section does not alter the law on tolling of the statute of limitations and does not apply to a right of action that accrued before the effective date of this chapter.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

§ 59.1-508.6.
Remedies for fraud.

Remedies for material misrepresentation or fraud include all remedies available under this chapter for nonfraudulent breach of contract.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

§ 59.1-508.7.
Measurement of damages in general.

Except as otherwise provided in the contract, an aggrieved party may not recover compensation for that part of a loss which could have been avoided by taking measures reasonable under the circumstances to avoid or reduce loss. The burden of establishing
a failure of the aggrieved party to take measures reasonable under the circumstances is on the party in breach of contract.

A party may not recover:

consequential damages for losses resulting from the content of published informational content unless the agreement expressly so provides; or

damages that are speculative.

The remedy for breach of contract for disclosure or misuse of information that is a trade secret or in which the aggrieved party has a right of confidentiality includes as consequential damages compensation for the benefit obtained as a result of the
breach.

For purposes of this chapter, market value is determined as of the date of breach of contract and the place for performance.

Damages or expenses that relate to events after the date of entry of judgment must be reduced to their present value as of that date. In this subsection, “present value” means the amount, as of a date certain, of one or more sums payable in the future
or the value of one or more performances due in the future, discounted to the date certain. The discount is determined by the interest rate specified by the parties in their agreement unless that rate was manifestly unreasonable
when the agreement was entered into. Otherwise, the discount is determined by a commercially reasonable rate that takes into account the circumstances of each case when the agreement was entered into.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

§ 59.1-508.8.
Licensor’s damages.

In this section, “substitute transaction” means a transaction by the licensor which would not have been possible except for the licensee’s breach and which transaction is for the same information or informational rights with the same contractual use terms
as the transaction to which the licensee’s breach applies.

Except as otherwise provided in § 59.1-508.7, a breach of contract by a licensee entitles the licensor to recover the following compensation for losses resulting in the ordinary course from the breach, less expenses avoided as a result of the breach,
to the extent not otherwise accounted for under this subsection:

damages measured in any combination of the following ways but not to exceed the contract fee and the market value of other consideration required under the contract for the performance that was the subject of the breach:

the amount of accrued and unpaid contract fees and the market value of other consideration earned but not received for:

any performance accepted by the licensee; and

any performance to which § 59.1-506.4 applies;

for performances not governed by subparagraph (A), if the licensee repudiated or wrongfully refused the performance or the licensor rightfully canceled and the breach makes possible a substitute transaction, the amount of loss as determined by contract
fees and the market value of other consideration required under the contract for the performance less:

the contract fees and market value of other consideration received from an actual and commercially reasonable substitute transaction entered into by the licensor in good faith and without unreasonable delay; or

the market value of a commercially reasonable hypothetical substitute transaction;

for performances not governed by subparagraph (A), if the breach does not make possible a substitute transaction, lost profit, including reasonable overhead, that the licensor would have realized on acceptance and full payment for performance that was
not delivered to the licensee because of the licensee’s breach; or

damages calculated in any reasonable manner; and

consequential and incidental damages.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

§ 59.1-508.9.
Licensee’s damages.

Subject to subsection (b) and except as otherwise provided in § 59.1-508.7, a breach of contract by a licensor entitles the licensee to recover the following compensation for losses resulting in the ordinary course from the breach or, if appropriate,
as to the whole contract, less expenses avoided as a result of the breach to the extent not otherwise accounted for under this section:

damages measured in any combination of the following ways, but not to exceed the market value of the performance that was the subject of the breach plus restitution of any amounts paid for performance not received and not accounted for within the indicated
recovery:

with respect to performance that has been accepted and the acceptance not rightfully revoked, the value of the performance required less the value of the performance accepted as of the time and place of acceptance;

with respect to performance that has not been rendered or that was rightfully refused or acceptance of which was rightfully revoked:

the amount of any payments made and the value of other consideration given to the licensor with respect to that performance and not previously returned to the licensee;

the market value of the performance less the contract fee for that performance; or

the cost of a commercially reasonable substitute transaction less the contract fee under the breached contract, if the substitute transaction was entered into by the licensee in good faith and without unreasonable delay for substantially similar information
with the same contractual use terms; or

damages calculated in any reasonable manner; and

incidental and consequential damages.

The amount of damages must be reduced by any unpaid contract fees for performance by the licensor which has been accepted by the licensee and as to which the acceptance has not been rightfully revoked.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

§ 59.1-508.10.
Recoupment.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), an aggrieved party, upon notifying the party in breach of contract of its intention to do so, may deduct all or any part of the damages resulting from the breach from any payments still due under the same
contract.

If a breach of contract is not material with reference to the particular performance, an aggrieved party may exercise its rights under subsection (a) only if the agreement does not require further affirmative performance by the other party and the amount
of damages deducted can be readily liquidated under the agreement.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

§ 59.1-508.11.
Specific performance.

Specific performance may be ordered:

if the agreement provides for that remedy, other than an obligation for the payment of money;

if the contract was not for personal services and the agreed performance is unique; or

in other proper circumstances.

An order for specific performance may contain any conditions considered just and must provide adequate safeguards consistent with the contract to protect the confidentiality of information, information, and informational rights of both parties.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

§ 59.1-508.12.
Completing performance.

On breach of contract by a licensee, the licensor may:

identify to the contract any conforming copy not already identified if, at the time the licensor learned of the breach, the copy was in its possession;

in the exercise of reasonable commercial judgment for purposes of avoiding loss and effective realization on effort or investment, complete the information and identify it to the contract, cease work on it, relicense or dispose of it, or proceed in any
other commercially reasonable manner; and

pursue any remedy for breach that has not been waived.

On breach by a licensee, both parties remain bound by all contractual use terms, but the contractual use terms do not apply to information or copies properly received or obtained from another source.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

§ 59.1-508.13.
Continuing use.

On breach of contract by a licensor, the following rules apply:

A licensee that has not canceled the contract may continue to use the information and informational rights under the contract. If the licensee continues to use the information or informational rights, the licensee is bound by all terms of the contract,
including contractual use terms, obligations not to compete, and obligations to pay contract fees.

The licensee may pursue any remedy for breach which has not been waived.

The licensor’s rights remain in effect but are subject to the licensee’s remedy for breach, including any right of recoupment or setoff.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

§ 59.1-508.14.
Discontinuing access.

On material breach of an access contract or if the agreement so provides, a party may discontinue all contractual rights of access of the party in breach and direct any person that is assisting the performance of the contract to discontinue its performance.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

§ 59.1-508.15.
Right to possession and to prevent use.

On cancellation of a license, the licensor has the right:

to possession of all copies of the licensed information in the possession or control of the licensee and any other materials pertaining to that information which by contract are to be returned or delivered by the licensee to the licensor; and

to prevent the continued exercise of contractual and informational rights in the licensed information under the license.

Except as otherwise provided in § 59.1-508.14, a licensor may exercise his rights under subsection (a) without judicial process only if this can be done:

without a breach of the peace;

without a foreseeable risk of personal injury or significant physical damage to information or property other than the licensed information; and

in accordance with § 59.1-508.16.

In a judicial proceeding, the court may enjoin a licensee in breach of contract from continued use of the information and informational rights and may order the licensor or a judicial officer to take the steps described in § 59.1-506.18.

A party has a right to an expedited judicial hearing on a request for prejudgment relief to enforce or protect its rights under this section.

The right to possession under this section is not available to the extent that the information, before breach of the license and in the ordinary course of performance under the license, was so altered or commingled that the information is no longer identifiable
or separable.

A licensee that provides information to a licensor subject to contractual use terms has the rights and is subject to the limitations of a licensor under this section with respect to the information he provides.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia technology law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1051. (2000).

§ 59.1-508.16.
Limitations on electronic self-help.

In this section,

“electronic self-help” means the use of electronic means to exercise a licensor’s rights under § 59.1-508.15 (b); and

“wrongful use of electronic self-help” means use of electronic self-help other than in compliance with this section.

On cancellation of a license, electronic self-help is not permitted, except as provided in this section. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, electronic self-help is prohibited in mass-market transactions.

If the parties agree to permit electronic self-help, a licensee shall separately manifest assent to a term authorizing use of electronic self-help. In accordance with subsection (c) of § 59.1-501.12, a general assent to a license containing a term authorizing
use of electronic self-help is not sufficient to manifest assent to the use of electronic self-help. The term must:

provide for notice of exercise as provided in subsection (d);

state the name of the person designated by the licensee to which notice of exercise must be given and the manner in which notice must be given and place to which notice must be sent to that person; and

provide a simple procedure for the licensee to change the designated person or place.

Before resorting to electronic self-help authorized by a term of the license, the licensor shall give notice in a record to the person designated by the licensee stating:

that the licensor intends to resort to electronic self-help as a remedy on or after forty-five days following receipt by the licensee of the notice;

the nature of the claimed breach that entitles the licensor to resort to self-help; and

the name, title, and address, including direct telephone number, facsimile number, or e-mail address, to which the licensee may communicate concerning the claimed breach.

A licensee may recover direct and incidental damages caused by wrongful use of electronic self-help. The licensee may also recover consequential damages for wrongful use of electronic self-help, whether or not those damages are excluded by the terms of
the license, if:

within the period specified in subsection (d) (1), the licensee gives notice to the licensor’s designated person describing in good faith the general nature and magnitude of damages;

the licensor has reason to know the damages of the type described in subsection (f) may result from the wrongful use of electronic self-help; or

the licensor does not provide the notice required in subsection (d).

Even if the licensor complies with subsections (c) and (d), electronic self-help may not be used if the licensor has reason to know that its use will result in substantial injury or harm to the public health or safety or grave harm to the public interest
substantially affecting third persons not involved in the dispute.

A court of competent jurisdiction of the Commonwealth shall give prompt consideration to a petition for injunctive relief and may enjoin, temporarily or permanently, the licensor from exercising electronic self-help even if authorized by a license term
or enjoin the licensee from misappropriation or misuse of computer information, as may be appropriate, upon consideration of the following:

harm of the kinds stated in subsection (f), or the threat thereof, whether or not the licensor has reason to know of those circumstances;

irreparable harm or threat of irreparable harm to the licensee or licensor;

that the party seeking the relief is more likely than not to succeed under his claim when it is finally adjudicated;

that all of the conditions to entitle a person to the relief under the laws of the Commonwealth have been fulfilled; and

that the party that may be adversely affected is adequately protected against loss, including a loss because of misappropriation or misuse of computer information, that he may suffer because the relief is granted under this chapter.

Before breach of contract, rights or obligations under this section may not be waived or varied by an agreement, but the parties may prohibit use of electronic self-help, and the parties, in the term referred to in subsection (c), may specify additional
provisions more favorable to the licensee.

This section does not apply if the licensor obtains physical possession of a copy without a breach of the peace and without the use of electronic self-help; in which case, a lawfully obtained copy may be erased or disabled by electronic means.

History.
2000, cc. 101, 996; 2001, c. 763.

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2001.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 763, in subsection (a), added the subdivision (1) designator, added “and” at the end of subdivision (1), and added subdivision (2); added the second sentence in subsection (b); in subsection (c), inserted “If the parties agree
to permit electronic self-help” at the beginning, and added the second sentence; deleted “grave” at the beginning of subdivision (g) (1); inserted “the parties may prohibit use of electronic self-help, and” in subsection (h); and in
subsection (i), inserted “physical,” and substituted “without the use of electronic self-help; in which case, a lawfully obtained copy may be erased or disabled by electronic means” for “the electronic self-help is used solely with
respect to that copy.”

Law Review.

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

§§ 59.1-508.17 through 59.1-509.
Reserved.